en: E311, Octyl gallate, Octyl gallate, Octyl ester of gallic acid
xx: E311
bg: E311, Октил галат
ca: E311, Gal·lat d'octil
cs: E311, Oktylgallát, Oktylgallát, oktylester kyseliny gallové
da: E311, Octylgallat, Octylgallat, octylester af gallusgarvesyre
de: E311, Octylgallat, Octylgallat, Octylester der Gallussäure
el: E311, Γαλλικος οκτυλεστερας, Γαλλικό οκτύλιο, Γαλλικός οκτυλεστέρας
es: E311, Galato de octilo
et: E311, Oktüülgallaat, Oktüülgallaat, Gallushappe oktüülester
fi: E311, Oktyyligallaatti, Gallushapon oktyyliesteri, Oktyyligallaattia, Gallushapon oktyyliesteriä
fr: E311, Gallate d'octyle
hu: E311, Oktil-gallát, Oktil-gallát, Galluszsav oktil-észtere
it: E311, Gallato di ottile
lt: E311, Oktilo galatas, Oktilgalatas, galo rūgšties oktilo esteris
lv: E311, Oktilgallāts, Oktilgallāts, gallusskābes oktilesteris
mt: E311, Gallat tal-ottil
nl: E311, Octylgallaat, Octylgallaat, octylester van galluszuur
pl: E311, Galusan oktylu
pt: E311, Galato de octilo
ro: E311, Galat de octil
sk: E311, Oktylgalát, Oktyl-galát, oktylester kyseliny gálovej, n-oktylester kyseliny 3, 4
sl: E311, Oktilgalat, oktilgalat, oktilester galne kisline
sv: E311, Oktylgallat, Oktylgallat, gallussyrans oktylester

en: E312, Dodecyl gallate
xx: E312
bg: E312, Додецил галат
ca: E312, Gal·lat de dodecil
cs: E312, Dodecylgallát
da: E312, Dodecylgallat
de: E312, Dodecylgallat
el: E312, Γαλλικος δωδεκυλεστερας
es: E312, Galato de dodecilo, Dodecilgalato, Galato de laurilo, Galato dodecilo
et: E312, Dodetsüülgallaat
fi: E312, Dodekyyligallaatti, Dodekyyligallaattia
fr: E312, Gallate dodécyle, Ester N-dodécylique, Gallate de dodécyle
hu: E312, Dodecil-gallát
it: E312, Gallato di dodecile
lt: E312, Dodecilo galatas
lv: E312, Dodecilgallāts
mt: E312, Gallat tad-dodeċil
nl: E312, Dodecylgallaat, Laurylgallaat
pl: E312, Galusan dodecylu
pt: E312, Galato de dodecilo
ro: E312, Galat de dodecil
sk: E312, Dodecylgalát
sl: E312, Dodecilgalat
sv: E312, Dodecylgallat

en: E313, Ethyl gallate
xx: E313
bg: E313, Ethyl gallate
cs: E313, Ethyl gallate
da: E313, Ethyl gallate
de: E313, Ethyl gallate
el: E313, Ethyl gallate
es: E313, Galato de etilo
et: E313, Ethyl gallate
fi: E313, Etyyligallaatti, Etyyligallaattia
fr: E313, Gallate d'éthyle
hu: E313, etil-gallát
it: E313, Ethyl gallate
lt: E313, Ethyl gallate
lv: E313, Ethyl gallate
mt: E313, Ethyl gallate
nl: E313, Ethyl gallate
pl: E313, Ethyl gallate
pt: E313, Ethyl gallate
ro: E313, Gelat de etil
sk: E313, Ethyl gallate
sl: E313, Ethyl gallate
sv: E313, Ethyl gallate

en: E314, Guaiacum
xx: E314
ar: E314, غاياكوم
az: E314, Qvayyakum
bg: E314, Гваякум
ca: E314, Guaiaç
cs: E314, Guajak
da: E314, Guajak
de: E314, Guajak
el: E314, Γκουαγιακ
es: E314, Guayaco
et: E314, Guaak
fi: E314, Guaaksihartsi, Guaaksihartsia
fr: E314, résine de gaïac
he: E314, גואיאק
hr: E314, Gvajak
hu: E314, guajak
id: E314, Guaiakum
it: E314, Guaiaco
ja: E314, グアヤク樹脂
ko: E314, 구아이악
lt: E314, Gvajakas
lv: E314, Gvajaks
mk: E314, Гвајак
ms: E314, Guaiacum
mt: E314, Guajak
nl: E314, Guaiac gum
pl: E314, Guajak
pt: E314, Guaiaco
ro: E314, Rășină de guaiac
ru: E314, Гваяк
sk: E314, Guajak
sl: E314, Gvajak
sr: E314, Гвајак
sv: E314, Guajak
tr: E314, Guayak
uk: E314, Гваяк
zh: E314, 愈创木

en: E315, Erythorbic acid, Isoascorbic acid
xx: E315
bg: E315, Ериторбинова киселина, Изоаскорбинова киселина
ca: E315, Àcid eritòrbic, acid eritoric
cs: E315, Kyselina erythorbová, Kyselina isoaskorbová
da: E315, Erythorbinsyre, Isoascorbinsyre
de: E315, Isoascorbinsäure, Erythorbinsäure
el: E315, Ερυθορβικο οξυ, Ισοασκορβικό οξύ
es: E315, Ácido eritórbico, Ácido isoascórbico
et: E315, Isoaskorbiinhape, Isoaskorbiinhape
fi: E315, Erytorbiinihappo, Isoaskorbiinihappo, D-araboaskorbiinihappo, Erytorbiinihappoa, Isoaskorbiinihappoa, D-araboaskorbiinihappoa
fr: E315, Acide érythorbique, Acide isoascorbique, Acide D-isoascorbique, acide araboascorbique, acide saccharosonique, eryscorbine, CAS 89-65-6
hr: E315, izoaskorbinska kiselina
hu: E315, Eritroaszkorbinsav, Izoaszkorbinsav
it: E315, Acido eritorbico, Acido isoascorbico
lt: E315, Eritorbo rūgštis, Izoaskorbo rūgštis
lv: E315, Eritrobīnskābe, Izoaskorbīnskābe
mt: E315, Aċidu eritorbiku, Aċidu Isoaskorbiku
nl: E315, Erythorbinezuur, Isoascorbinezuur, Iso-ascorbinezuur
pl: E315, Kwas izoaskorbinowy (erytrobowy)
pt: E315, Ácido eritórbico, Ácido isoascórbico
ro: E315, Acid eritorbic, Acid izoascorbic
sk: E315, Kyselina erytorbová, Kyselina izoaskorbová
sl: E315, Eritorbinska kislina, izoaskorbinska kislina
sv: E315, Isoaskorbinsyra
tr: E315, Eritorbik asit, İso-askorbik asit, İso-vitamin C

en: E316, sodium erythorbate
xx: E316
ar: E316, إيريثوربات صوديوم
bg: E316, Натриев ериторбат, натриев еритробат
ca: E316, Eritorbat de sodi, eritorbat sòdic
cs: E316, Erythorban sodný
da: E316, Natriumerythorbat
de: E316, Natriumisoascorbat, Natriumerythorbat
el: E316, Ερυθορβικο νατριο
eo: E316, Natria eritorbato
es: E316, eritorbato sódico, isoascorbate de sodio
et: E316, Naatriumerütorbaat
fa: E316, سدیم اریتوربات
fi: E316, Natriumerytorbaatti, Natriumerytorbaattia
fr: E316, érythorbate de sodium, isoascorbate de sodium
hr: E316, natrijev izoaskorbat
hu: E316, Nátrium-eritroaszkorbát
it: E316, eritorbato di sodio
ja: E316, エリソルビン酸ナトリウム, エリソルビン酸Na, エリソルビン酸Ｎａ, イソアスコルビン酸ナトリウム, イソアスコルビン酸Na, イソアスコルビン酸Ｎａ
lt: E316, Natrio eritorbatas
lv: E316, Nātrija eritorbāts
mt: E316, Eritorbat tas-sodju
nl: E316, natriumisoascorbaat, Natriumerythorbaat
pl: E316, Izoaskorbinian sodu
pt: E316, Eritorbato de sódio
ro: E316, eritorbat de sodiu, erithorbat de sodiu
ru: E316, Эриторбат натрия, изоаскорбат натрия
sh: E316, Natrijum erithorbat
sk: E316, Erytorban sodný, izoaskorban sodný
sl: E316, Natrijev eritorbat
sr: E316, Natrijum erithorbat
sv: E316, natriumisoaskorbat
zh: E316, 异抗坏血酸钠

en: E317, Erythorbin acid
xx: E317
bg: E317, Киселина ериторбин
cs: E317, Kyselina erythorbinová
el: E317, Ερυθορβικό οξύ
es: E317, Ácido eritorbínico
et: E317, Eritorbiinhape
fr: E317, Isoascorbate de potassium
hu: E317, Eritorbinsav
it: E317, Acido eritorbinico
lv: E317, Eritorbīnskābe
mt: E317, Aċidu erythorbin
pl: E317, Kwas erytrobinowy
pt: E317, Ácido eritorbínico
sv: E317, Erytorbinsyra

en: E318, Calcium erythorbin
xx: E318
bg: E318, Калциев ериторбин
cs: E318, Vápenatý erythorbin
da: E318, Calcium erythorbin
de: E318, Calciumerythorbat
el: E318, Ερυθορβικό ασβέστιο
es: E318, Eritorbinato de calcio
et: E318, Kaltsiumerütorbaat
fi: E318, Kalsiumerytorbaatti
fr: E318, Isoascorbate de calcium, Érythorbate de calcium, E 318
hu: E318, Kalcium-eritorbin
it: E318, Eritorbato di calcio
lt: E318, Kalcio eritorbatas
lv: E318, Kalcija eritorbāts
mt: E318, Eritorbat tal-kalċju
nl: E318, Calciumerythorbaat
pl: E318, Izosorbinian wapnia
pt: E318, Eritorbato de cálcio
ro: E318, Isoascorbat de calciu
sk: E318, Vápenatý erytorbát
sl: E318, Kalcijev eritorbat
sv: E318, Calciumerytorbat

en: E319, Tertiary-butylhydroquinone (tbhq), Tert-butyl-1\,4-benzenediol, Butylhydroxinon, TBHQ, Tert-Butylhydroquinone, tertiary butylhydroquinone
xx: E319
bg: E319, Третичен бутилхидроквинон (тбхк), Терт-бутил-1\,4-бензендиол
ca: E319, Tertbutilhidroquinona, TBHQ
cs: E319, Terciární butylhydrochinon (tbhq), Terc-butyl-1\,4-benzendiol
da: E319, Tert-butylhydroquinon (tbhq), tert-Butyl-1\,4-benzendiol
de: E319, Tertiär-butylhydrochinon, TBHQ, tert-Butyl-1\,4-benzendiol
el: E319, Τριτοταγης βουτυλ-υδροκινονη (tbhq), τριτ. βουτυλο-βενζολοδιόλη-1\,4
es: E319, Terbutilhidroquinona (tbhq), t-butil-1\,4-bencenodiol, TBHQ
et: E319, Tertsiaarbutüülhüdrokinoon (tbhq), Tert-butüül-1\,4-benseendiool
fi: E319, Tertbutyylihydroksikinoni (tbhq)
fr: E319, Butylhydroquinone tertiaire, BHQT 319, BHQT, tert-Butylhydroquinone, TBHQ, t-BHQ, T-BUTYL HYDROQUINONE, T-BUTYLHYDROQUINONE, tertiary butylhydroquinone, CAS 1948-33-0, Tertiary Butyl Hydroquinone, Butylhydroquinone, Tert-butyl-2 hydroquinone, Tert-butyl hydroquinone, 2-Tert-butyl hydroquinone, Hydroquinone de butyle tertiaire, -butylhydroquinone tertiaire (bhqt), 4-benzènediol
hu: E319, Terc-butil-hidrokinon (tbhq), Terc-butil-1\,4-benzoldiol, Terc-butil-hidrokinon
it: E319, Butilidrochinone terziario (tbhq), Terz-butil-1\,4-benzendiolo, Terz-butil-idrochinone
lt: E319, Tretinis butilhidrochinonas (tbhq)
lv: E319, Terc-butilhidrohinons (tbhq), Terc-Butil-1\,4-benzdiols
mt: E319, Butilidrokinon terzjarju (tbhq), Tert-butil-1\,4-benżendiol
nl: E319, Tert-butylhydrochinon (tbhq), tert-Butyl-1\,4-benzeendiol, Tert-butylhydrochinon
pl: E319, Tert-butylohydrochinon (tbhq)
pt: E319, Terc butil-hidroquinona (tbhq), terc-Butil-1\,4-benzenodiol
ro: E319, Butilhidrochinonă terțiară (tbhq), Terț-butil-1\,4-benzendiol
ru: E319, e319, Трет-бутилгидрохинон, Трет бутилгидрохинон
sk: E319, Terciálny butylhydrochinón (tbhq), Terc-butyl-1\,4-benzéndiol
sl: E319, Terc-butilhidrokinon (tbhq), terc-butil-1\,4-benzendiol
sv: E319, Tertiär-butylhydrokinon (tbhq), Tertbutyl-1\,4-bensendiol, tertiär butylhydrokinon

en: E320, Butylated hydroxyanisole (bha), Butylated hydroxyanisole, BHA
xx: E320
bg: E320, Бутил хидроксианизол (бха)
ca: E320, Butilhidroxianisol, BHA
cs: E320, Butylhydroxyanisol (bha), 3-terc-butyl-4-hydroxyanisol
da: E320, Butylhydroxyanisol (bha), 3-tert-Butyl-4-hydroxyanisol, Butylhydroxyanisol
de: E320, Butylhydroxyanisol, BHA, 3-tert-Butyl-4-hydroxyanisol, Butylhydroxyanisol, E 320
el: E320, Βουτυλ-υδροξυανισολη (bha), 3-τριτ. βουτυλ-4-υδροξυανισόλη
es: E320, Butilhidroxianisol, 3-t-butil-4-hidroxianisol, BHA, E 320, Hidroxibutilanisol
et: E320, Butüülhüdroksüanisool (bha)
fi: E320, Butyylihydroksianisoli (bha), BHA
fr: E320, Butylhydroxyanisol, BHA, 3-tert-butyl-4-hydroxyanisole, Hydroxyanisol butyle, Hydroxyanisole butylé, 2BHA, 2-tertiobutyl-4-hydroxyanisole, 25013-16-5, 2-BHA, 3-tertiobutyl-4-hydroxyanisole, 8003-24-5, 3BHA, Butylated hydroxyanisole, 9009-68-1, C11H16O2, 3-BHA
hr: E320, butil hidroksiansol
hu: E320, Butilezett hidroxi-anizol (bha), 3-terc-Butil-4-hidroxi-anizol, Butil-hidroxi-anizol
it: E320, Butilidrossianisolo (bha), 3-ter-butil-4-idrossianisolo, Butilidrossianisolo, 3-t-butil-4-idrossianisolo, Idrossianisolo butilato, C11H16O2, Butil-4-idrossianisolo, 2-t-butil-4-idrossianisolo
lt: E320, Butilintas hidroksianizolas (bha), Butilhidroksianizolis
lv: E320, Butilhidroksianizols (bha)
mt: E320, Idrossilanisol butilat (bha)
nl: E320, Butylhydroxyanisool (bha), 3-tert-Butyl-4-hydroxyanisool, Butylhydroxyanisol, Butylhydroxyanisool
pl: E320, Butylohydroksyanizol (bha), Butylowany hydroksyanizol, Butylohydroksyanizol, BHA
pt: E320, Butil-hidroxianisole (bha), 3-terc-Butil-4-hidroxianisole, BHA
ro: E320, Butilhidroxianisol (bha), 3-terț-butil-4-hidroxianisol
ru: E320, e320, Бутилгидроксианизол
sk: E320, Butylovaný hydroxyanizol (bha)
sl: E320, Butilhidroksianizol (bha), 3-terc-butil-4-hidroksianizol
sv: E320, Butylhydroxianisol (bha), Butylhydroxianisol, E 320

en: E321, Butylated hydroxytoluene, BHT, 2\,6-Ditertiary-butyl-p-cresol, Butylated hydroxytoluene, bht added to preserve freshness
xx: E321
bg: E321, Бутилхидрокситолуол (бхт), 2\,6-дитретичен-бутил-р-крезол
ca: E321, Butilhidroxitoluè, BHT
cs: E321, Butylhydroxytoluen (bht), 2\,6-diterciární butyl-p-krezol, Butylhydroxytoluen
da: E321, Butylhydroxytoluen (bht), 2\,6-Di-tert-butyl-p-cresol
de: E321, Butylhydroxytoluen, BHT, 2\,6-Di-tert-butyl-p-kresol, Butylhydroxytoluol
el: E321, Βουτυλ-υδροξυτολουολιο (βητ), 2\,6-Δι-τριτ. βουτυλο-p-κρεσόλη
es: E321, Butilhidroxitolueno, 2\,6-di-t-butil-p-cresol, BHT
et: E321, Butüülhüdroksütolueen (bht), 2\,6-di-tert-butüül-p-kresool
fi: E321, Butyylihydroksitolueeni (bht), Butyloitu hydroksitolueeni
fr: E321, Butylhydroxytoluène, BHT, 6-Butylditertiaire-p-crésol, Hydroxytoluène butyle
hu: E321, Butilezett hidroxi-toluol (bht), 2\,6-Di-terc-butil-p-krezol, Butil-hidroxi-toluol
it: E321, Butilidrossitoluene (bht), 2\,6-di-terz-butil-p-cresolo, Butilidrossitoluene
lt: E321, Butilintas hidroksitoluenas (bht), 2\,6-ditret-butil-p-krezolis
lv: E321, Butilhidroksitoluols (bht), 2\,6-Diterc-butil-p-krezols
mt: E321, Idrositoluwen butilat (bht), 2\,6-Diterzjarju-butil-p-kresol
nl: E321, Butylhydroxytolueen, 2\,6-Di-tert-butyl-p-kresol, Butylhydroxytolueen, bht
pl: E321, Butylohydroksytoluen, 2\,6-ditert-butylo-p-krezol, Butylowany hydroksytoluen, BHT
pt: E321, Butil-hidroxitolueno (bht), 2\,6-Di-terc-butil-p-cresol, BHT
ro: E321, Butilhidroxitoluen (bht), 2\,6-diterț-butil-p-cresol
ru: E321, e321, бутилгидрокситолуол
sk: E321, Butylovaný hydroxytoluén (bht), 2\,6-diterc-butyl-p-krezol
sl: E321, Butilhidroksitoluen (bht), 2\,6-diterc-butil-p-krezol
sv: E321, Butylhydroxitoluen (bht), 2\,6-Ditertiär-butyl-p-kresol
tr: E321, Butillendirilmiş hidroksi toluen, Butillendirilmiş hidroksitoluen

en: E322, Lecithins, Phosphatides
xx: E322
ar: E322, ليسيثين
bg: E322, Лецитини, Фосфатиди
ca: E322, lecitines
cs: E322, Lecitiny, Fosfatidy
da: E322, Lecithiner, Phosphatider
de: E322, Lecithine, Lecithinen, Phosphatide
el: E322, Λεκιθινες, Φωσφατίδια
es: E322, Lecitinas, Fosfátidos
et: E322, Letsitiinid, Fosfatiidid
fi: E322, Lesitiinit, Fosfatidit, Lesitiinejä, Fosfatidejä
fr: E322, Lécithines, Phosphatidylcholine, Phosphatides, Phospholipides, Phospho lutéines
he: E322, לציטינים, פוספטידים, תרכובות שומניות
hr: E322, lecitini, sojin ili suncokretov lecitin
hu: E322, Lecitinek, Foszfatidek
it: E322, Lecitine, Fosfatidi
lt: E322, Lecitinai, Fosfatidai
lv: E322, Lecitīni, Fosfatīdi
mt: E322, Leċitini, Fosfatidi
nb: E322, Lecitiner
nl: E322, Lecithinen, Fosfatiden
pl: E322, Lecytyny, Fosfatydy
pt: E322, Lecitinas, Fosfatídeos
ro: E322, Lecitine, Fosfatide
ru: E322, Лецитины, е322, соевый лецитин-e322
sk: E322, Lecitíny, Fosfatidy
sl: E322, Lecitini, fosfatidi
sv: E322, Lecitiner, Fosfatider

en: E322(i), Lecithin
xx: E322(i)
bg: E322(i), Лецитин
ca: E322(i), lecitina
cs: E322(i), lecitin
da: E322(i), Lecitin, lecithin
de: E322(i), Lecithin
el: E322(i), λεκιθίνη
eo: E322(i), Lecitino
es: E322(i), Lecitina
et: E322(i), Letsitiin
eu: E322(i), Lezitina
fa: E322(i), لسیتین
fi: E322(i), Lesitiini, Lesitiiniä
fr: E322(i), Lécithine
gl: E322(i), Lecitina
he: E322(i), לציטין
hr: E322(i), Lecitin
hu: E322(i), Lecitin
hy: E322(i), Լեցիտիններ
id: E322(i), Lesitin
is: E322(i), Lesitín
it: E322(i), Lecitina
ja: E322(i), レシチン
ko: E322(i), 레시틴
ms: E322(i), Lesitin
nl: E322(i), Lecithine
pl: E322(i), lecytyna
pt: E322(i), lecitina
ro: E322(i), Lecitină
ru: E322(i), Лецитин
sh: E322(i), Lecitin
sl: E322(i), Lecitin
sr: E322(i), Лецитин
su: E322(i), Lésitin
sv: E322(i), Lecitin
th: E322(i), เลซิทิน
tr: E322(i), Lesitin
uk: E322(i), Лецитин
uz: E322(i), Letsinlar
vi: E322(i), Lecithin
zh: E322(i), 卵磷脂

en: E322(ii), Partially hydrolyzed lecithin
xx: E322(ii)
bg: E322(ii), Частично хидролизирана лецитин
cs: E322(ii), Částečně hydrolyzovaný lecitin
da: E322(ii), Delvist hydrolyseret lecithin
de: E322(ii), Teilweise hydrolysiertes Lecithin
el: E322(ii), Μερικώς υδρολυμένη λεκιθίνη
es: E322(ii), Lecitina parcialmente hidrolizada
et: E322(ii), Osaühendatud letsitiin
fi: E322(ii), Osittain hydrolysoitu lesitiini, Osittain hydrolysoitua lesitiiniä
fr: E322(ii), Lécithine partiellement hydrolysée
hu: E322(ii), Részben hidrolizált lecitin
it: E322(ii), Lecitina parzialmente idrolizzata
lt: E322(ii), Dalinai hidrolizuotas lecitinas
lv: E322(ii), Daļēji hidrolizēts lecitīns
mt: E322(ii), Lecitina parzjalment idrolizzata
nl: E322(ii), Gedeeltelijk gehydrolyseerde lecithine
pl: E322(ii), Częściowo uwodorniony lecytyna
pt: E322(ii), Lecitina parcialmente hidrolisada
ro: E322(ii), Lecitină parțial hidrolizată
sk: E322(ii), Čiastočne hydrolyzovaný lecitín
sl: E322(ii), Delno hidrolizirana lecitin
sv: E322(ii), Delvis hydrolyserad lecitin

en: E322(iii), Lecithin\, hydroxylated
xx: E322(iii)

en: E322a, Oat lecithin
xx: E322a
ar: E322a, ليسيثين الشوفان
az: E322a, Yulaf lesitini
bg: E322a, Овесен лецитин
ca: E322a, Lecitina de civada
cs: E322a, Ovesný lecitin
da: E322a, Havrel lecithin
de: E322a, Haferlecithin
el: E322a, Λεκιθίνη βρώμης
eo: E322a, Avena lecitino
es: E322a, Lecitina de avena
et: E322a, Kaera letsitiin
fi: E322a, Kauralesitiini
fr: E322a, Lécithine d'avoine
hr: E322a, Zobeni lecitin
hu: E322a, Zab lecitin
it: E322a, lecitina di avena
ja: E322a, オート麦レシチン
ko: E322a, 귀리 레시틴
lt: E322a, Avižų lecitinas
lv: E322a, Auzu lecitīns
mk: E322a, Лецитин од овес
mt: E322a, Leċitina tal-ħafur
nl: E322a, Haverlecithine
pl: E322a, Lecytyna owsiana
pt: E322a, Lecitina de aveia
ro: E322a, Lecitină de ovăz
ru: E322a, Овсяный лецитин
sk: E322a, Ovsený lecitín
sl: E322a, Ovesni lecitin
sq: E322a, Lecitinë tërshëre
sr: E322a, Овсени лецитин
sv: E322a, Havrelecitin
tr: E322a, Yulaf lesitini
uk: E322a, Вівсяний лецитин
zh: E322a, 燕麦卵磷脂

en: E323, Anoxomer
xx: E323
ar: E323, أنوكسومير
az: E323, Anoksoomer
bg: E323, Аноксомер
ca: E323, Anoxòmer
cs: E323, Anoxomer
da: E323, Anoxomer
de: E323, Anoxomer
el: E323, Ανοξομερές
eo: E323, Anoxomer
es: E323, Anoxómero
et: E323, Anoksomeer
fi: E323, Anoksomeeri, Anoksomeeriä
fr: E323, Anoxomère
hr: E323, Anoksomer
hu: E323, Anoxomer
it: E323, Anossomero
ja: E323, アノクソマー
ko: E323, 아녹소머
lt: E323, Anoksomeras
lv: E323, Anoksomers
mk: E323, Аноксомер
mt: E323, Anossomeru
nl: E323, Anoxomeer
pl: E323, Anoksomer
pt: E323, Anoxómero
ro: E323, Anoxomer
ru: E323, Аноксомер
sk: E323, Anoxomer
sl: E323, Anoksomer
sv: E323, Anoxomer
tr: E323, Anoksomer
uk: E323, Аноксомер
zh: E323, 阿诺索默

en: E324, Ethoxyquin
xx: E324
bg: E324, Етоксиквин
cs: E324, Ethoxyquin
da: E324, Ethoxyquin
de: E324, Ethoxyquin
el: E324, Ετοξυκίνη
es: E324, Etoxiquina
et: E324, Ethoxyquin
fi: E324, Etoksikviini, Etoksikviiniä, Etoxyquin
fr: E324, Étoxyquine
hu: E324, Etoxikvin
it: E324, Etoxichina
lt: E324, Ethoxyquin
lv: E324, Ethoxyquin
mt: E324, Ethoxyquin
nl: E324, Ethoxyquin
pl: E324, Etoksychina, etoksyquina, Etoxyquin
pt: E324, Etoxiquina
ro: E324, Etoxiquină
sk: E324, Ethoxyquin
sl: E324, Ethoxyquin
sv: E324, Ethoxyquin

en: E325, sodium lactate
xx: E325
ar: E325, لاكتات الصوديوم
bg: E325, Натриев лактат
ca: E325, Lactat de sodi
cs: E325, Mléčnan sodný
da: E325, Natriumlactat
de: E325, Natriumlactat
el: E325, Γαλακτικο νατριο
eo: E325, Natria laktato
es: E325, lactato sódico
et: E325, Naatriumlaktaat
fa: E325, سدیم لاکتات
fi: E325, natriumlaktaatti, natriumlaktaattia
fr: E325, lactate de sodium
ga: E325, lachtaláit sóidiam
hr: E325, natrijev laktilat, natrijev laktat
hu: E325, Nátrium-laktát
it: E325, lattato di sodio
ja: E325, 乳酸ナトリウム, 乳酸Na, 乳酸Ｎａ
lt: E325, Natrio laktatas
lv: E325, Nātrija laktāts
mt: E325, Lattat tas-sodju
nl: E325, natriumlactaat
pl: E325, Mleczan sodu
pt: E325, lactato de sódio
ro: E325, Lactat de sodiu
ru: E325, лактат натрия
sh: E325, Natrijum laktat
sk: E325, Mliečnan sodný
sl: E325, Natrijev laktat
sr: E325, Natrijum laktat
sv: E325, natriumlaktat
vi: E325, Natri lactat
zh: E325, 乳酸钠

en: E326, potassium lactate
xx: E326
bg: E326, Калиев лактат
ca: E326, Lactat de potassi, lactat potàssic
cs: E326, Mléčnan draselný
da: E326, kaliumlaktat, kaliumlactat
de: E326, Kalumlactat
el: E326, Γαλακτικο καλιο
eo: E326, Kalia laktato
es: E326, lactato potasico
et: E326, Kaaliumlaktaat
fi: E326, kaliumlaktaatti, kaliumlaktaattia
fr: E326, lactate de potassium
hr: E326, kalijev laktat
hu: E326, Kálium-laktát
it: E326, lattato di potassio
ja: E326, 乳酸カリウム, 乳酸K, 乳酸Ｋ
lt: E326, kalio laktatas
lv: E326, kālija laktāts
mt: E326, Lattat tal-potassju
nb: E326, Kaliumlaktat
nl: E326, kaliumlactaat, kalium lactaat
pl: E326, mleczan potasu
pt: E326, lactato de potássio
ro: E326, Lactat de potasiu
ru: E326, лактат калия
sh: E326, Kalijum laktat
sk: E326, mliečnan draselný
sl: E326, Kalijev laktat
sr: E326, Kalijum laktat
sv: E326, kaliumlaktat
ta: E326, பொட்டாசியம் லாக்டேட்டு